language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 165 Y 36
SFX 165 0 a .
SFX 165 0 ach .
SFX 165 0 achmej .
SFX 165 0 achmy .
SFX 165 0 achu .
SFX 165 0 am .
SFX 165 0 ami .
SFX 165 0 ašo .
SFX 165 0 aštej .
SFX 165 0 ašćo .
SFX 165 0 e .
SFX 165 0 eg .
SFX 165 0 ego .
SFX 165 0 ej .
SFX 165 0 eje .
SFX 165 0 eju .
SFX 165 0 em .
SFX 165 0 emu .
SFX 165 0 i .
SFX 165 0 ich .
SFX 165 0 im .
SFX 165 0 ima .
SFX 165 0 imej .
SFX 165 0 imi .
SFX 165 0 imy .
SFX 165 0 itej .
SFX 165 0 iśo .
SFX 165 0 iš .
SFX 165 0 mej .
SFX 165 0 my .
SFX 165 0 oma .
SFX 165 0 ow .
SFX 165 0 owu .
SFX 165 0 tej .
SFX 165 0 u .
SFX 165 0 ćo .
SFX 166 Y 23
SFX 166 0 a .
SFX 166 0 ach .
SFX 166 0 am .
SFX 166 0 ami .
SFX 166 0 e .
SFX 166 0 ech .
SFX 166 0 echmej .
SFX 166 0 echmy .
SFX 166 0 echu .
SFX 166 0 ešo .
SFX 166 0 eštej .
SFX 166 0 ešćo .
SFX 166 0 o .
SFX 166 0 om .
SFX 166 0 oma .
SFX 166 0 omej .
SFX 166 0 omy .
SFX 166 0 otej .
SFX 166 0 ow .
SFX 166 0 owu .
SFX 166 0 ośo .
SFX 166 0 oš .
SFX 166 0 u .
SFX 167 Y 6
SFX 167 0 aj .
SFX 167 0 aju .
SFX 167 0 am .
SFX 167 0 ama .
SFX 167 0 ami .
SFX 167 0 as .
SFX 168 Y 5
SFX 168 0 ach .
SFX 168 0 am .
SFX 168 0 ami .
SFX 168 0 i .
SFX 168 0 imi .
SFX 169 Y 6
SFX 169 0 ach .
SFX 169 0 am .
SFX 169 0 ami .
SFX 169 0 e .
SFX 169 0 i .
SFX 169 0 imi .
SFX 170 Y 26
SFX 170 0 a .
SFX 170 0 ach .
SFX 170 0 am .
SFX 170 0 ami .
SFX 170 0 i .
SFX 170 0 ijo .
SFX 170 0 ijom .
SFX 170 0 ijomej .
SFX 170 0 ijomy .
SFX 170 0 ijotej .
SFX 170 0 ijośo .
SFX 170 0 ijoš .
SFX 170 0 iju .
SFX 170 0 im .
SFX 170 0 imej .
SFX 170 0 imy .
SFX 170 0 itej .
SFX 170 0 iśo .
SFX 170 0 iš .
SFX 170 0 o .
SFX 170 0 oju .
SFX 170 0 om .
SFX 170 0 oma .
SFX 170 0 ow .
SFX 170 0 owu .
SFX 170 0 u .
SFX 171 Y 26
SFX 171 0 a .
SFX 171 0 ach .
SFX 171 0 am .
SFX 171 0 ami .
SFX 171 0 i .
SFX 171 0 ijo .
SFX 171 0 ijom .
SFX 171 0 ijomej .
SFX 171 0 ijomy .
SFX 171 0 ijotej .
SFX 171 0 ijośo .
SFX 171 0 ijoš .
SFX 171 0 iju .
SFX 171 0 im .
SFX 171 0 imej .
SFX 171 0 imy .
SFX 171 0 itej .
SFX 171 0 iśo .
SFX 171 0 iš .
SFX 171 0 oju .
SFX 171 0 om .
SFX 171 0 oma .
SFX 171 0 ow .
SFX 171 0 owu .
SFX 171 0 u .
SFX 171 0 y .
SFX 172 Y 24
SFX 172 0 a .
SFX 172 0 ach .
SFX 172 0 am .
SFX 172 0 ami .
SFX 172 0 i .
SFX 172 0 ijo .
SFX 172 0 ijom .
SFX 172 0 ijomej .
SFX 172 0 ijomy .
SFX 172 0 ijotej .
SFX 172 0 ijośo .
SFX 172 0 ijoš .
SFX 172 0 iju .
SFX 172 0 imej .
SFX 172 0 imy .
SFX 172 0 itej .
SFX 172 0 iśo .
SFX 172 0 oju .
SFX 172 0 om .
SFX 172 0 oma .
SFX 172 0 ow .
SFX 172 0 owu .
SFX 172 0 u .
SFX 172 0 y .
SFX 173 Y 7
SFX 173 0 e .
SFX 173 0 eg .
SFX 173 0 ego .
SFX 173 0 ej .
SFX 173 0 eju .
SFX 173 0 em .
SFX 173 0 emu .
SFX 174 Y 20
SFX 174 0 e .
SFX 174 0 mej .
SFX 174 0 my .
SFX 174 0 o .
SFX 174 0 om .
SFX 174 0 omej .
SFX 174 0 omy .
SFX 174 0 otej .
SFX 174 0 ośo .
SFX 174 0 oš .
SFX 174 0 tej .
SFX 174 0 u .
SFX 174 0 y .
SFX 174 0 ym .
SFX 174 0 ymej .
SFX 174 0 ymy .
SFX 174 0 ytej .
SFX 174 0 yśo .
SFX 174 0 yš .
SFX 174 0 ćo .
SFX 175 Y 9
SFX 175 0 a .
SFX 175 0 ach .
SFX 175 0 am .
SFX 175 0 ami .
SFX 175 0 o .
SFX 175 0 oju .
SFX 175 0 om .
SFX 175 0 ow .
SFX 175 0 u .
SFX 176 Y 32
SFX 176 0 ach .
SFX 176 0 achmej .
SFX 176 0 achmy .
SFX 176 0 achu .
SFX 176 0 am .
SFX 176 0 ami .
SFX 176 0 ašo .
SFX 176 0 aštej .
SFX 176 0 ašćo .
SFX 176 0 e .
SFX 176 0 mej .
SFX 176 0 my .
SFX 176 0 o .
SFX 176 0 om .
SFX 176 0 oma .
SFX 176 0 omej .
SFX 176 0 omy .
SFX 176 0 otej .
SFX 176 0 ow .
SFX 176 0 owu .
SFX 176 0 ośo .
SFX 176 0 oš .
SFX 176 0 tej .
SFX 176 0 u .
SFX 176 0 y .
SFX 176 0 ym .
SFX 176 0 ymej .
SFX 176 0 ymy .
SFX 176 0 ytej .
SFX 176 0 yśo .
SFX 176 0 yš .
SFX 176 0 ćo .
SFX 177 Y 5
SFX 177 0 ach .
SFX 177 0 am .
SFX 177 0 ami .
SFX 177 0 y .
SFX 177 0 ymi .
SFX 178 Y 4
SFX 178 0 ich .
SFX 178 0 im .
SFX 178 0 ima .
SFX 178 0 imi .
SFX 179 Y 5
SFX 179 0 i .
SFX 179 0 ich .
SFX 179 0 im .
SFX 179 0 ima .
SFX 179 0 imi .
SFX 180 Y 36
SFX 180 0 a .
SFX 180 0 ach .
SFX 180 0 achmej .
SFX 180 0 achmy .
SFX 180 0 achu .
SFX 180 0 am .
SFX 180 0 ami .
SFX 180 0 ašo .
SFX 180 0 aštej .
SFX 180 0 ašćo .
SFX 180 0 e .
SFX 180 0 eg .
SFX 180 0 ego .
SFX 180 0 ej .
SFX 180 0 eje .
SFX 180 0 eju .
SFX 180 0 em .
SFX 180 0 emu .
SFX 180 0 mej .
SFX 180 0 my .
SFX 180 0 oma .
SFX 180 0 ow .
SFX 180 0 owu .
SFX 180 0 tej .
SFX 180 0 u .
SFX 180 0 y .
SFX 180 0 ych .
SFX 180 0 ym .
SFX 180 0 yma .
SFX 180 0 ymej .
SFX 180 0 ymi .
SFX 180 0 ymy .
SFX 180 0 ytej .
SFX 180 0 yśo .
SFX 180 0 yš .
SFX 180 0 ćo .
SFX 181 Y 7
SFX 181 0 a .
SFX 181 0 eju .
SFX 181 0 i .
SFX 181 0 im .
SFX 181 0 oma .
SFX 181 0 owu .
SFX 181 0 u .
SFX 182 Y 7
SFX 182 0 a .
SFX 182 0 eju .
SFX 182 0 i .
SFX 182 0 im .
SFX 182 0 oma .
SFX 182 0 owu .
SFX 182 0 u .
SFX 183 Y 6
SFX 183 0 a .
SFX 183 0 oju .
SFX 183 0 om .
SFX 183 0 oma .
SFX 183 0 owu .
SFX 183 0 u .
SFX 184 Y 6
SFX 184 0 a .
SFX 184 0 oju .
SFX 184 0 om .
SFX 184 0 oma .
SFX 184 0 owu .
SFX 184 0 u .
SFX 185 Y 7
SFX 185 0 a .
SFX 185 0 e .
SFX 185 0 oju .
SFX 185 0 om .
SFX 185 0 oma .
SFX 185 0 owu .
SFX 185 0 u .
SFX 186 Y 22
SFX 186 0 a .
SFX 186 0 ach .
SFX 186 0 achmej .
SFX 186 0 achmy .
SFX 186 0 achu .
SFX 186 0 am .
SFX 186 0 ami .
SFX 186 0 ašo .
SFX 186 0 aštej .
SFX 186 0 ašćo .
SFX 186 0 e .
SFX 186 0 i .
SFX 186 0 im .
SFX 186 0 imej .
SFX 186 0 imy .
SFX 186 0 itej .
SFX 186 0 iśo .
SFX 186 0 iš .
SFX 186 0 oma .
SFX 186 0 ow .
SFX 186 0 owu .
SFX 186 0 u .
SFX 187 Y 21
SFX 187 0 ach .
SFX 187 0 achmej .
SFX 187 0 achmy .
SFX 187 0 achu .
SFX 187 0 am .
SFX 187 0 ami .
SFX 187 0 ašo .
SFX 187 0 aštej .
SFX 187 0 ašćo .
SFX 187 0 e .
SFX 187 0 i .
SFX 187 0 im .
SFX 187 0 imej .
SFX 187 0 imy .
SFX 187 0 itej .
SFX 187 0 iśo .
SFX 187 0 iš .
SFX 187 0 oma .
SFX 187 0 ow .
SFX 187 0 owu .
SFX 187 0 u .
SFX 188 Y 7
SFX 188 0 y .
SFX 188 0 ym .
SFX 188 0 ymej .
SFX 188 0 ymy .
SFX 188 0 ytej .
SFX 188 0 yśo .
SFX 188 0 yš .
SFX 189 Y 8
SFX 189 0 e .
SFX 189 0 y .
SFX 189 0 ym .
SFX 189 0 ymej .
SFX 189 0 ymy .
SFX 189 0 ytej .
SFX 189 0 yśo .
SFX 189 0 yš .
SFX 190 Y 23
SFX 190 0 a .
SFX 190 0 ach .
SFX 190 0 achmej .
SFX 190 0 achmy .
SFX 190 0 achu .
SFX 190 0 am .
SFX 190 0 ami .
SFX 190 0 ašo .
SFX 190 0 aštej .
SFX 190 0 ašćo .
SFX 190 0 e .
SFX 190 0 mej .
SFX 190 0 my .
SFX 190 0 ow .
SFX 190 0 tej .
SFX 190 0 y .
SFX 190 0 ym .
SFX 190 0 ymej .
SFX 190 0 ymy .
SFX 190 0 ytej .
SFX 190 0 yśo .
SFX 190 0 yš .
SFX 190 0 ćo .
SFX 191 Y 20
SFX 191 0 ijo .
SFX 191 0 ijom .
SFX 191 0 ijomej .
SFX 191 0 ijomy .
SFX 191 0 ijotej .
SFX 191 0 ijośo .
SFX 191 0 ijoš .
SFX 191 0 iju .
SFX 191 0 mej .
SFX 191 0 my .
SFX 191 0 o .
SFX 191 0 om .
SFX 191 0 omej .
SFX 191 0 omy .
SFX 191 0 otej .
SFX 191 0 ośo .
SFX 191 0 oš .
SFX 191 0 tej .
SFX 191 0 u .
SFX 191 0 śo .
SFX 192 Y 27
SFX 192 0 a .
SFX 192 0 e .
SFX 192 0 eg .
SFX 192 0 ego .
SFX 192 0 ej .
SFX 192 0 eje .
SFX 192 0 eju .
SFX 192 0 em .
SFX 192 0 emu .
SFX 192 0 ijo .
SFX 192 0 ijom .
SFX 192 0 ijomej .
SFX 192 0 ijomy .
SFX 192 0 ijotej .
SFX 192 0 ijośo .
SFX 192 0 ijoš .
SFX 192 0 iju .
SFX 192 0 mej .
SFX 192 0 my .
SFX 192 0 tej .
SFX 192 0 u .
SFX 192 0 y .
SFX 192 0 ych .
SFX 192 0 ym .
SFX 192 0 yma .
SFX 192 0 ymi .
SFX 192 0 śo .
SFX 193 Y 26
SFX 193 0 a .
SFX 193 0 e .
SFX 193 0 eg .
SFX 193 0 ego .
SFX 193 0 ej .
SFX 193 0 eje .
SFX 193 0 eju .
SFX 193 0 em .
SFX 193 0 emu .
SFX 193 0 i .
SFX 193 0 im .
SFX 193 0 imej .
SFX 193 0 imy .
SFX 193 0 itej .
SFX 193 0 iśo .
SFX 193 0 iš .
SFX 193 0 mej .
SFX 193 0 my .
SFX 193 0 tej .
SFX 193 0 u .
SFX 193 0 y .
SFX 193 0 ych .
SFX 193 0 ym .
SFX 193 0 yma .
SFX 193 0 ymi .
SFX 193 0 śo .
SFX 194 Y 23
SFX 194 0 a .
SFX 194 0 ach .
SFX 194 0 achmej .
SFX 194 0 achmy .
SFX 194 0 achu .
SFX 194 0 am .
SFX 194 0 ami .
SFX 194 0 ašo .
SFX 194 0 aštej .
SFX 194 0 ašćo .
SFX 194 0 e .
SFX 194 0 m .
SFX 194 0 mej .
SFX 194 0 my .
SFX 194 0 oju .
SFX 194 0 om .
SFX 194 0 oma .
SFX 194 0 ow .
SFX 194 0 owu .
SFX 194 0 tej .
SFX 194 0 u .
SFX 194 0 śo .
SFX 194 0 š .
