language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Cerw/1,178
Cow/1,178
Cowj/1,173
Dłop/1,178
Dłopj/1,173
Linj/1,173
Lipa-góleś/1,181
Lipa-źiś/1,168
Lutki-góleś/1,181
Lutki-źiś/1,168
Sowj/1,173
Tarp/1,178
Tarpj/1,173
Terp/1,178
Terpj/1,173
Witaj-góleś/1,181
Witaj-źiś/1,168
alfazwěrjeś/1,181
bacilus/183
bratšow/193
brinc/174
bóžem/1,178
bóžemj/1,173
cazow/193
chłošć/165
comic/183
contergangóleś/1,181
conterganźiś/1,168
dar/171
deln/1,179
dešćow/193
gnoj/194
gołubjeś/1,181
gron/170
głup/193
gływuch/1,175
jagnjeś/1,181
jatš/177
jałowjeś/1,181
juchow/193
kachl/1,186
kaśeś/1,181
kněž/190
kurjawkow/193
kózleś/1,181
kóśeś/1,181
kśiw/193
kšaw/193
kšupow/193
libjeś/1,181
lub/193
medium/183
mukow/193
mysl/187
młoźeś/182
nazymj/1,173
niž/176
njaborjeś/1,181
njebrinc/174
njedešćow/193
njelub/193
njepokoj/194
njepódaj/191
njepótaj/191
njepśisćel/191
njerdž/1,189
njerozdaj/191
njesc/1,189
njestrow/193
njetrjech/1,188
njewudaj/191
njezataj/191
njeźiw/193
nježyw/193
omegazwěrjeś/1,181
parl/1,186
parow/193
pileś/1,181
pjerkow/193
pjerow/193
pokoj/194
proseś/1,181
pódaj/191
pódwok/1,175
pódzymj/1,173
pókśiw/192
pósłab/192
pótaj/191
pótup/192
pśesłab/192
pśetun/1,179
pśeśiw/193
pśisćel/191
raceś/1,181
rdž/1,189
roj/194
rozdaj/191
rožow/193
sc/1,189
skóśeś/1,181
sněgow/193
sobjeś/1,181
spik/1,184
spike/185
strow/193
studnj/1,166
swěśeś/1,181
syśeś/1,181
słab/193
trjech/1,188
tup/193
tšodl/1,186
tšumpl/1,186
w/167
wobjatš/177
wobsłab/192
wobwok/1,175
wobzym/1,178
wobzymj/1,173
woman/172
wrobleś/1,181
wuch/1,175
wudaj/191
wugron/170
wupjerkow/192
wuśeś/1,181
wósłab/192
wóźiw/192
wšow/193
zataj/191
znoj/194
zwěrjeś/1,181
zymj/1,173
łakom/193
łoj/194
śeleś/1,181
śeśenjeś/1,181
śiš/180
šlimow/193
šćenjeś/1,181
źiś/1,169
Žlob/1,178
žrěbjeś/1,181
žyw/193
